Massachusetts, session 194th, H2754.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, Chapter 32 
of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is amended in 
Section 20(3)(e) by striking, the following: 
"but, such attorney shall not be a member in service of the system or a member of the 
retirement board."